es: Bricolaje > Accesorios para herramientas > Accesorios para martillos: Accesorios para martillos neumáticos; Empuñaduras para martillos; Cabezales para martillos
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Werkzeugzubehör > Hammerzubehör: Drucklufthammerzubehör; Hammerstiele; Hammerköpfe
en: Hardware > Tool Accessories > Hammer Accessories: Air Hammer Accessories; Hammer Handles; Hammer Heads
sk-SK: Náradie > Náradie a príslušenstvo > Príslušenstvo pre kladivá: Príslušenstvo pre pneumatické kladivá; Rukoväte kladiva; Hlavy kladiva
hr-HR: Željezarija > Dodaci za alat > Pribor za čekiće: Pribor za pneumatske čekiće; Drške čekića; Glave čekića
bg-BG: Железария > Аксесоари за инструменти > Аксесоари за чук: Аксесоари за въздушен чук; Дръжки за чук; Глави на чук
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Dodatki za orodje > Dodatki za kladiva: Dodatki za pnevmatska kladiva; Ročaji za kladiva; Glave za kladiva
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > อุปกรณ์เครื่องมือ > อุปกรณ์ค้อน: อุปกรณ์ค้อนลม; ด้ามจับค้อน; ส่วนหัวของค้อน
pt-BR: Ferragens > Acessórios para ferramentas > Acessórios para martelos: Acessórios para martelo de pressão; Cabos de martelo; Cabeças de martelo
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 工具配件 > 锤子配件: 气锤配件; 锤柄; 锤头
fi: Rakentaminen > Työkalujen lisätarvikkeet > Vasaratarvikkeet: Paineilmavasaran lisätarvikkeet; Vasaran varret; Vasaran päät
pl: Sprzęt > Akcesoria do narzędzi > Akcesoria do młotków: Akcesoria do młotków pneumatycznych; Trzonki do młotków; Obuchy do młotków
zh-TW: 硬體 > 工具配件 > 錘配件: 氣槍槌配件; 錘柄; 榔頭
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Αξεσουάρ εργαλείων > Αξεσουάρ σφυριού: Αξεσουάρ αερόσφυρας; Λαβές σφυριού; Κεφαλές σφυριού
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Аксессуары для инструментов > Аксессуары для молотков: Аксессуары для пневматических молотков; Рукоятки для молотков; Бойки для молотков
sv: Metallprodukter > Verktygstillbehör > Tillbehör till hammare: Tillbehör till lufthammare; Hammarskaft; Hammarhuvuden
tr: Hırdavat > Alet Aksesuarları > Çekiç Aksesuarları: Havalı Çekiç Aksesuarları; Çekiç Sapları; Çekiç Başları
da: Isenkram > Værktøj – tilbehør > Hammer – tilbehør: Lufthammer – tilbehør; Hammer – håndtag; Hammerhoveder
ja: DIY用品 > 工具関連用品 > ハンマー関連用品: エアハンマー関連用品; ハンマー取っ手; ハンマーヘッド
vi: Phần cứng > Phụ kiện dụng cụ > Phụ kiện cho búa: Phụ kiện búa hơi; Cán búa; Đầu búa
pt-PT: Equipamento > Acessórios de ferramentas > Acessórios de martelo: Acessórios de martelo pneumático; Cabos de martelo; Cabeças de martelo
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Nástroje a nářadí – příslušenství > Příslušenství ke kladivům: Příslušenství k pneumatickým kladivům; Topůrka pro kladiva; Hlavy kladiva
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Gereedschapaccessoires > Hameraccessoires: Accessoires voor luchthamers; Hamerstelen; Hamerkoppen
hu: Hardver > Szerszám-kiegészítők > Kalapácskiegészítők: Légkalapács-kiegészítők; Kalapácsfogantyúk; Kalapácsfejek
ro-RO: Feronerie > Accesorii pentru unelte > Accesorii ciocan: Accesorii ciocan pneumatic; Cozi ciocan; Capete ciocan
ko: 철물 > 공구 부대용품 > 망치 부대용품: 공기 해머 부대용품; 망치 손잡이; 망치 헤드
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Accessori per attrezzi > Accessori per martelli: Accessori per martelli ad aria compressa; Manici di martelli; Teste per martelli
nb: Maskinvare > Verktøytilbehør > Tilbehør til hammere: Tilbehør til lufthammere; Hammerhåndtak; Hammerhoder
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Įrankių priedai > Plaktukų priedai: Pneumatinių plaktukų priedai; Plaktukų rankenos; Plaktukų galvutės
fr: Quincaillerie > Accessoires d’outils > Accessoires pour marteaux: Accessoires pour marteaux à air comprimé; Poignées de marteau; Têtes de marteaux